src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - eemeed: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    eemeed+N+Sg+Nom: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Gen: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Acc: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Ill: [emedân, eˊmedân]
    eemeed+N+Sg+Loc: [emedist, eˊmedist]
    eemeed+N+Sg+Com: [emedáin, eˊmedáin]
    eemeed+N+Sg+Abe: eemeedttáá
    eemeed+N+Ess: [emedin, eˊmedin]
    eemeed+N+Par: [emedid, eˊmedid]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Nom: [emedeh, eˊmedeh]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Gen: [emedij, eˊmedij]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Acc: [emedijd, eˊmedijd]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Ill: [emedáid, eˊmedáid]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Loc: [emedijn, eˊmedijn]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Com: [emedijguin, eˊmedijguin]
    eemeed+N+Pl+Abe: [emedijttáá, eˊmedijttáá]

  Noun - iiđeed: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Nom: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Gen: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Acc: iiđeed
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Ill: [iđedân, iˊđedân]
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Loc: [iđedist, iˊđedist]
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Com: [iđedáin, iˊđedáin]
    iiđeed+N+Sg+Abe: iiđeedttáá
    iiđeed+N+Ess: [iđedin, iˊđedin]
    iiđeed+N+Par: [iđedid, iˊđedid]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Nom: [iđedeh, iˊđedeh]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Gen: [iđedij, iˊđedij]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Acc: [iđedijd, iˊđedijd]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Ill: [iđedáid, iˊđedáid]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Loc: [iđedijn, iˊđedijn]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Com: [iđedijguin, iˊđedijguin]
    iiđeed+N+Pl+Abe: [iđedijttáá, iˊđedijttáá]

  Noun - raameeg: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    raameeg+N+Sg+Nom: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Gen: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Acc: raameeg
    raameeg+N+Sg+Ill: [ramegân, raˊmegân]
    raameeg+N+Sg+Loc: [ramegist, raˊmegist]
    raameeg+N+Sg+Com: [ramegáin, raˊmegáin]
    raameeg+N+Sg+Abe: raameegttáá
    raameeg+N+Ess: [ramegin, raˊmegin]
    raameeg+N+Par: [ramegid, raˊmegid]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Nom: [ramegeh, raˊmegeh]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Gen: [ramegij, raˊmegij]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Acc: [ramegijd, raˊmegijd]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Ill: [ramegáid, raˊmegáid]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Loc: [ramegijn, raˊmegijn]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Com: [ramegijguin, raˊmegijguin]
    raameeg+N+Pl+Abe: [ramegijttáá, raˊmegijttáá]

  Noun - puureeh: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    puureeh+N+Sg+Nom: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Gen: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Acc: puureeh
    puureeh+N+Sg+Ill: [purehân, puˊrehân]
    puureeh+N+Sg+Loc: [purehist, puˊrehist]
    puureeh+N+Sg+Com: [pureháin, puˊreháin]
    puureeh+N+Sg+Abe: puureehttáá
    puureeh+N+Ess: [purehin, puˊrehin]
    puureeh+N+Par: [purehid, puˊrehid]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Nom: [pureheh, puˊreheh]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Gen: [purehij, puˊrehij]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Acc: [purehijd, puˊrehijd]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Ill: [pureháid, puˊreháid]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Loc: [purehijn, puˊrehijn]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Com: [purehijguin, puˊrehijguin]
    puureeh+N+Pl+Abe: [purehijttáá, puˊrehijttáá]

  Noun - kiiruurg: # MLO, checked; my mother knows only the short form
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Nom: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Gen: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Acc: kiiruurg
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Ill: kirurgân
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Loc: kirurgist
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Com: kirurgáin
    kiiruurg+N+Sg+Abe: kiiruurgttáá
    kiiruurg+N+Ess: kirurgin
    kiiruurg+N+Par: kirurgid
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Nom: kirurgeh
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Gen: kirurgij
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Acc: kirurgijd
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Ill: kirurgáid
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Loc: kirurgijn
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Com: kirurgijguin
    kiiruurg+N+Pl+Abe: kirurgijttáá

  Noun - vookaal: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    vookaal+N+Sg+Nom: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Gen: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Acc: vookaal
    vookaal+N+Sg+Ill: [vokalân, voˊkalân]
    vookaal+N+Sg+Loc: [vokalist, voˊkalist]
    vookaal+N+Sg+Com: [vokaláin, voˊkaláin]
    vookaal+N+Sg+Abe: vookaalttáá
    vookaal+N+Ess: [vokalin, voˊkalin]
    vookaal+N+Par: [vokalid, voˊkalid]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Nom: [vokaleh, voˊkaleh]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Gen: [vokalij, voˊkalij]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Acc: [vokalijd, voˊkalijd]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Ill: [vokaláid, voˊkaláid]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Loc: [vokalijn, voˊkalijn]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Com: [vokalijguin, voˊkalijguin]
    vookaal+N+Pl+Abe: [vokalijttáá, voˊkalijttáá]

  Noun - kaanaal: # MLO, checked; short / half long
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Nom: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Gen: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Acc: kaanaal
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Ill: [kanalân, kaˊnalân]
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Loc: [kanalist, kaˊnalist]
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Com: [kanaláin, kaˊnaláin]
    kaanaal+N+Sg+Abe: kaanaalttáá
    kaanaal+N+Ess: [kanalin, kaˊnalin]
    kaanaal+N+Par: [kanalin, kaˊnalid]
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Nom: kaˊnaleh
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Gen: kaˊnalij
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Acc: kaˊnalijd
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Ill: kaˊnaláid
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Loc: kaˊnalijn
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Com: kaˊnalijguin
    kaanaal+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊnalijttáá

  Noun - juuriist: # MLO, checked; only short form
    juuriist+N+Sg+Nom: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Gen: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Acc: juuriist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Ill: juristân
    juuriist+N+Sg+Loc: juristist
    juuriist+N+Sg+Com: juristáin
    juuriist+N+Sg+Abe: juuriisttáá
    juuriist+N+Ess: juristin
    juuriist+N+Par: juristid
    juuriist+N+Pl+Nom: juristeh
    juuriist+N+Pl+Gen: juristij
    juuriist+N+Pl+Acc: juristijd
    juuriist+N+Pl+Ill: juristáid
    juuriist+N+Pl+Loc: juristijn
    juuriist+N+Pl+Com: juristijguin
    juuriist+N+Pl+Abe: juristijttáá


  Noun - jiereeh: # MLO, checked; only short form
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Nom: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Gen: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Acc: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Ill: jieˊrehân
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Loc: jieˊrehist
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Com: jieˊreháin
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Abe: jiereehttáá
    jiereeh+N+Ess: jieˊrehin
    jiereeh+N+Par: jieˊrehid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Nom: jieˊreheh
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Gen: jieˊrehij
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Acc: jieˊrehijd
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Ill: jieˊreháid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Loc: jieˊrehijn
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Com: jieˊrehijguin
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Abe: jieˊrehijttáá
 
  Noun - čuáđáád: # MLO, ok; only short form; is this really a noun?
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Nom: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Gen: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Acc: čuáđáád
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Ill: čuáˊđádân
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Loc: čuáˊđádist
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Com: čuáˊđádáin
    čuáđáád+N+Sg+Abe: čuáđáádttáá
    čuáđáád+N+Ess: čuáˊđádin
    čuáđáád+N+Par: čuáˊđádid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Nom: čuáˊđádeh
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Gen: čuáˊđádij
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Acc: čuáˊđádijd
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Ill: čuáˊđádáid
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Loc: čuáˊđádijn
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Com: čuáˊđádijguin
    čuáđáád+N+Pl+Abe: čuáˊđádijttáá

  Noun - iäláán: # MLO, ok; ođđa sátni  1B
    iäláán+N+Sg+Nom: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Gen: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Acc: iäláán
    iäláán+N+Sg+Ill: iäˊlánân
    iäláán+N+Sg+Loc: iäˊlánist
    iäláán+N+Sg+Com: iäˊlánáin
    iäláán+N+Sg+Abe: iäˊláánttáá
    iäláán+N+Ess:    iäˊlánin
    iäláán+N+Par:    iäˊlánid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Nom: iäˊláneh
    iäláán+N+Pl+Gen: iäˊlánij
    iäláán+N+Pl+Acc: iäˊlánijd
    iäláán+N+Pl+Ill: iäˊlánáid
    iäláán+N+Pl+Loc: iäˊlánijn
    iäláán+N+Pl+Com: iäˊlánijguin
    iäláán+N+Pl+Abe: iäˊlánijttáá

  Noun - saalaat: # MLO, ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi: POTTAAK
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Nom: saalaat
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Gen: saalaat
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Acc: saalaat
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Ill: salatân
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Loc: salatist
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Com: salatáin
    saalaat+v2+N+Sg+Abe: saalaattáá
    saalaat+v2+N+Ess: salatin
    saalaat+v2+N+Par: salatid
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Nom: salateh
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Gen: salatij
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Acc: salatijd
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Ill: salatáid
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Loc: salatijn
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Com: salatijguin
    saalaat+v2+N+Pl+Abe: salatijttáá

  Noun - toomaat: # MLO, ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi POTTAAK
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Nom: toomaat
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Gen: toomaat
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Acc: toomaat
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Ill: [tomatân, toˊmatân]
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Loc: [tomatist, toˊmatist]
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Com: [tomatáin, toˊmatáin]
    toomaat+v2+N+Sg+Abe: toomaattáá
    toomaat+v2+N+Ess: [tomatin, toˊmatin]
    toomaat+v2+N+Par: [tomatid, toˊmatid]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Nom: [tomateh, toˊmateh]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [tomatij, toˊmatij]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Acc: [tomatijd, toˊmatijd]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Ill: [tomatáid, toˊmatáid]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Loc: [tomatijn, toˊmatijn]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Com: [tomatijguin, toˊmatijguin]
    toomaat+v2+N+Pl+Abe: [tomatijttáá, toˊmatijttáá]
    
  Noun - rooboot: # MLO, ok Matti Morottaja sujâttem mield; nubbe vyehi LITTER
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Nom: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Gen: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Acc: rooboot
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Ill: [robotân, roˊbotân]
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Loc: [robotist, roˊbotist]
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Com: [robotáin, roˊbotáin]
    rooboot+v2+N+Sg+Abe: rooboottáá
    rooboot+v2+N+Ess: [robotin, roˊbotin]
    rooboot+v2+N+Par: [robotid, roˊbotid]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Nom: [roboteh, roˊboteh]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Gen: [robotij, roˊbotij]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Acc: [robotijd, roˊbotijd]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Ill: [robotáid, roˊbotáid]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Loc: [robotijn, roˊbotijn]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Com: [robotijguin, roˊbotijguin]
    rooboot+v2+N+Pl+Abe: [robotijttáá, roˊbotijttáá]
    
  Noun - ruávást: # MLO, checked 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    ruávást+N+Sg+Nom: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Gen: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Acc: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Ill: ruáˊvástân
    ruávást+N+Sg+Loc: ruáˊvástist
    ruávást+N+Sg+Com: ruáˊvástáin
    ruávást+N+Sg+Abe: ruávásttáá
    ruávást+N+Ess: ruáˊvástin
    ruávást+N+Par: ruáˊvástid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Nom: ruáˊvásteh
    ruávást+N+Pl+Gen: ruáˊvástij
    ruávást+N+Pl+Acc: ruáˊvástijd
    ruávást+N+Pl+Ill: ruáˊvástáid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Loc: ruáˊvástijn
    ruávást+N+Pl+Com: ruáˊvástijguin
    ruávást+N+Pl+Abe: ruáˊvástijttáá

  Noun - siilak: # MLO ok; only short form  1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    siilak+N+Sg+Nom: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Gen: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Acc: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Ill: silakân
    siilak+N+Sg+Loc: silakist
    siilak+N+Sg+Com: silakáin
    siilak+N+Sg+Abe: siilakttáá
    siilak+N+Ess: silakin
    siilak+N+Par: silakid
    siilak+N+Pl+Nom: silakeh
    siilak+N+Pl+Gen: silakij
    siilak+N+Pl+Acc: silakijd
    siilak+N+Pl+Ill: silakáid
    siilak+N+Pl+Loc: silakijn
    siilak+N+Pl+Com: silakijguin
    siilak+N+Pl+Abe: silakijttáá
    
  Noun - kappeer: # MLO, ok
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: [kaperân, kaˊperân]
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: [kaperist, kaˊperist] 
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: [kaperáin, kaˊperáin]
    kappeer+N+Ess: [kaperin, kaˊperin]
    kappeer+N+Par: [kaperid, kaˊperid]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: [kapereh, kaˊpereh]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: [kaperij, kaˊperij]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: [kaperijd, kaˊperijd]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: [kaperáid, kaˊperáid]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: [kaperijn, kaˊperijn]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: [kaperijttáá, kaˊperijguin]
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: [kaperijttáá, kaˊperijttáá]

  Noun - immeel: # MLO, ok 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: [iṃelân, iˊṃelân]
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: [iṃelist, iˊṃelist]
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: [iˊṃeláin, iˊṃeláin]
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: [iṃelin, iˊṃelin]
    immeel+N+Par: [iṃelid, iˊṃelid]
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: [iṃeleh, iˊṃeleh]
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: [iṃelij, iˊṃelij]
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: [iṃelijd, iˊṃelijd]
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: [iṃeláid, iˊṃeláid]
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: [iṃelijn, iˊṃelijn]
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: [iṃelijguin, iˊṃelijguin]
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: [iṃelijttáá, iˊṃelijttáá]
